Alabama, session 2026rs, HB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the City Council of Vestavia Hills, by ordinance, may
establish up to five total entertainment districts within the
city permitting consumption of alcoholic beverages purchased
from on-premises alcoholic beverage licenses to be consumed by
purchasers anywhere within the entertainment districts. The
term on-premises as applied to consumption of alcoholic
beverages in each entertainment district shall include
anywhere within the district.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB144 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2